California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(b) With respect to administrative funds and welfare funds received pursuant to Sections 19533, 19606.5, 19613, and 19641, the audit shall be conducted within 90 days of the close of the fund’s business year. The audit shall cover the period of time since the last audit, and a copy thereof shall be filed with the board, and the Senate and Assembly Committees on Governmental Organization.

(c) The horsemen’s organizations shall bear the cost of the audit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 505, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

19441.

The board shall annually make a full report to the Governor and the Legislature of its proceedings and the state of the business of horse racing for the preceding fiscal year, on or before January 31, and shall embody therein any recommendations deemed needed for improved functioning of the horse racing laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19441.2.

In its annual report required under Section 19441, the board shall include a tabulation of injuries, fatalities, and comparative accident rates for all racing and training venues within its jurisdiction. The report shall also include recommendations concerning the worker safety impacts of improvements in racetrack design, jockey equipment, racing procedures, and track and facility maintenance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1259, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19442.2.

The board shall, if possible, designate at least one steward at each track where a horse racing meeting is conducted who is a former jockey or at least one steward at each track where a harness meeting is conducted who is a former driver.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19443.

The Attorney General and every district attorney shall enforce this chapter in their capacities as law enforcement officers.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19442 by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1080.)
-------------------------------------------

19444.

In performing its responsibilities pursuant to this chapter, the board may do the following:

(a) Pay membership fees, join, and participate in the affairs of associations having for their purpose the interchange of information relating to racing law enforcement, the licensing of horse racing participants, the registration of race horses, and subjects relating to the duties of the board.

(b) Tabulate, analyze, and publish statistical information based upon parimutuel handles, attendance, distribution of parimutuel proceeds among fees, commissions, purses, and awards, and upon the breeding and production of race horses or other information relating to parimutuel wagering.

(c) Conduct research to determine more fully the cause and prevention of horse racing accidents, the effects of drug substances on the race horses, and the means for detection of foreign drug substances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19446.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a veterinarian shall not administer medications to any horse entered in the same race in which a horse is entered which he or she owns or trains.

In addition to any penalty provided for by this chapter or any other law, a violation of this section by any licensed veterinarian shall be grounds for denial, revocation, or suspension of a license or imposition of a fine pursuant to Section 4883 and the veterinarian shall be subject to disciplinary action pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 4875) of Chapter 11 of Division 2.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19446 (as amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1091, Sec. 13) by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1120, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

19447.

If a question of consent is appealed to the board under subdivision (a) of Section 19601 or subdivision (f) of Section 19605.3, the board shall hold a hearing on the appeal. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may hold a hearing pursuant to this section within 24 hours of noticing the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 575, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

19448.

(a) The board shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of all of the following individuals pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code:

(1) A current or prospective employee.

(2) A current or prospective contractor.

(3) A current or prospective holder of a license issued pursuant Section 19480.

(4) A racing official, as defined in Section 19510.

(5) A current or prospective holder of a license issued pursuant to
 Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 19520).

(b) The Department of Justice shall provide a state- or federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(c) The board’s chief of licensing and enforcement may investigate the criminal history of all persons listed in subdivision (a) in order to make a final determination of a person’s fitness to perform duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 997, Sec. 2.   (AB 179)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Backstretch Worker Labor Relations [19455. - 19455.4.]

19455.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that Section 923 of the Labor Code recognizes that it is necessary that the individual worker have full freedom of association, self-organization, and designation of representatives of his or her own choosing, to negotiate the terms and conditions of his or her employment, and that he or she shall be free from the interference, restraint, or coercion of employers of labor, or their agents, in the designation of representatives or in self-organization or in other concerted activities for the purpose of collective bargaining.

(b) The Legislature finds that the National Labor Relations Board has formally declined to assert jurisdiction over horse racing because of extensive state control over the industry, the dominant pattern of sporadic short-term employment which poses problems for the effective enforcement of the National Labor Relations Act, and a unique and special relationship that has developed between the states and the industry.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish an orderly procedure for backstretch employees to exercise their statutory rights to organize a labor union, in order to reduce the prospect of any strikes, disruptions, or economic action that would interfere with the operation of horse racing meetings in California.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (e), the board shall oversee the conduct of a union recognition procedure for backstretch employees under the following conditions:

(1) Employees shall have the right to join, or refuse to join, a labor organization for purposes of collective bargaining and mutual aid and protection. Existing state-recognized organizations of trainers or horsemen established pursuant to the Horse Racing Law shall not use funds derived or distributed from parimutuel wagering pursuant to state law to advocate or advance any position with respect to unionization of employees. Individual trainers and horsemen, and their agents, shall not coerce or threaten any employee of any trainer or horseman because of the exercise of rights pursuant to this article. No employee shall be discharged or discriminated against for expressing any opinion concerning the selection of a labor union or collective bargaining agent for employees under this article. No trainer or horseman, or group of trainers or horsemen, shall dominate or interfere with the formation or administration of any labor organization established under this article nor contribute financial or other support to it.

(2) The labor union and its representatives shall not coerce or threaten any employee of any trainer or horseman because of the exercise of rights pursuant to this article.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, within 30 days of a request by a bona fide labor organization representing workers in the horse racing industry in California, accompanied by a petition of 125 licensed backstretch workers, the board shall provide the labor organization with a list of all backstretch workers including the type of licenses they hold, their employer, the location at which they are employed, and their address and telephone number. The board may require of any trainer licensee information in the licensee’s possession necessary to comply with this requirement. The labor union shall use this list solely for the purposes of this article, and maintain it in a manner, as the board may require, to preserve the integrity of horse racing. The board may impose an appropriate penalty for any other use.

(4) Every licensed trainer who employs backstretch employees shall file with the board, not later than February 1, 2002, and, within seven days of the commencement of each race meeting thereafter, a complete and accurate list of the names of its backstretch workers. In addition, every trainer shall file with the board a complete, accurate, and updated list within seven days of any changes which occur to the most recently filed list. The lists described in this section, together with any updates thereto, shall be provided within 72 hours after receipt by the board, to any bona fide labor organization which has requested copies thereof and submitted a petition containing the names of 125 backstretch workers pursuant to paragraph (3). Any request need only be made one time and the board shall thereafter be required to provide these lists and any updates thereto in accordance with the provisions of this section so long as a bona fide labor organization seeks to represent licensed backstretch workers.

(5) The labor union may obtain board recognition as the exclusive bargaining agent for employees of employers pursuant to the provisions and procedures described in paragraph (8).

(6) For the purposes of this article:

(A) “Backstretch employee” or “backstretch worker” means a person licensed by the board pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1481 of Division 4 of Title 4 of the California Code of Regulations.

(B) “Multiemployer bargaining unit” means any bargaining unit created and recognized pursuant to the terms of clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (8).

(C) “Approved election unit” means any election unit created and recognized pursuant to paragraph (7).

(7) There are four election units created and recognized pursuant to this section, as follows:

(A) Backstretch employees working for trainers of thoroughbred horses stabled at licensed racetracks, including fairs and approved auxiliary training facilities in the combined central and southern zones.

(B) Backstretch employees working for trainers of thoroughbred horses stabled at licensed racetracks, including fairs and approved auxiliary training facilities in the northern zone.

(C) Backstretch employees working for trainers of quarter horses stabled at licensed racetracks and approved auxiliary training facilities in the combined central and southern zones.

(D) Backstretch employees working for trainers of harness horses stabled at licensed racetracks, including fairs and approved auxiliary training facilities in the northern zone.

The board shall use the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service for all appropriate purposes of this act, including operations related to the conduct of recognition procedures and elections.

(8) (A) With respect to backstretch workers, a labor organization seeking recognition as the collective bargaining agent for these workers shall collect signed cards indicating individual worker’s intent to be represented by that organization for collective bargaining purposes and submit those cards to the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service for review and validation. When the labor organization is in receipt of cards signed by workers equaling at least 30 percent of the employees in an election unit described in paragraph (4), the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service shall conduct a secret ballot election with respect to the election unit as soon as is practicable thereafter, but in no event more than 30 calendar days after validation by the service of the cards.

Those backstretch employees entitled to vote in the election shall be those who appear on the licensed trainer’s most recent list described in paragraph (3). However, each employer may update his or her list not more than 72 hours prior to the election. If it is determined by the stewards pursuant to the provisions in paragraph (11), that the employer filed an inaccurate or erroneous list with a willful intention to manipulate the results of an election, and that the inaccuracy or error may have affected the outcome of the election, the stewards shall decree that the employer lost the election, regardless of the actual outcome thereof, and the stewards shall issue an order to the trainer to negotiate with the union.

(i) Any election shall be conducted by the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service under rules established by the service consistent with standard practice. The rules shall be established no more than 60 days after the effective date of this section, shall be made available to the bona fide labor union and employers of backstretch employees, and shall be exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act. The rules shall provide for a secret ballot system for the conduct of the election pursuant to which ballots cast by backstretch employees of individual employers shall be cast by insertion into envelopes appropriately identified with respect to each employer. The envelopes shall be collected and tabulated in secret by the service, subject to observation by one representative designated by the bona fide labor organization and one representative designated by the organization representing trainers pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 19613.2. Upon completion of the tabulation, the service shall issue a report certifying those employers, the majority of whose employees who participated in the election voted in favor of representation by the union. Those employers so certified shall be required to bargain with the labor union pursuant to this subdivision. All other employers shall not be required to negotiate with the union and there shall not be another election with respect to those employers for at least one year from the date of the prior election. The service shall not make public the numerical tabulation of votes by employer.

(ii) Protests over challenged ballots shall be resolved by the service in a consolidated hearing commencing no later than three business days after the election.

(iii) Within 45 days of the certification of the results of the election by the service to the board, those trainers who are required to bargain pursuant to this subparagraph may form multiple employer bargaining units in accordance with the provisions of this subdivision. Further, the organization representing trainers pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 19613.2 shall conduct a meeting regarding the formulation of multiple employer bargaining units within five days of the certification of the results of the election. For licensed trainers described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (7), the minimum number of backstretch employees employed by licensed trainers comprising the multiple employer bargaining unit as of the date of the election shall be the lesser of 100 employees or 10 percent of the total employees subject to bargaining. For licensed trainers described in subparagraphs (B), (C), and (D), of paragraph (7), the minimum number of backstretch employees employed by licensed trainers comprising the multiple employer bargaining unit as of the date of the election shall be the lesser of 50 employees or 10 percent of the total employees subject to bargaining. The minimum number of backstretch employees employed by licensed trainers in order to qualify as a multiple employer bargaining unit pursuant to this subdivision may, with the consent of the recognized labor union, be reduced. On or before the 45th day following the certification of the results of the election, each representative of a multiple employer bargaining unit formed pursuant to this subdivision shall notify the board and the exclusive collective bargaining agent, in writing, that a unit has been formed, disclose the names of the licensed trainers which comprise the unit, and indicate the number and names of the backstretch employees which are employed by the licensed trainers comprising the unit. Except to join another multiple employer bargaining unit, without the consent of the bona fide labor organization, a trainer who has elected to join a multiple employer bargaining unit may not thereafter elect to resign from the unit except within a 30-day period prior to the date of the expiration of the collective bargaining agreement resulting from the negotiations. The employees of a licensed trainer who has resigned from a multiple employer bargaining unit and has not joined another unit, shall not be entitled to petition to decertify the union for a period of one year from the date of the expiration of the collective bargaining agreement which resulted from the negotiation between the union and the multiple employer bargaining unit of which he or she was formerly a member and which was in effect at the time of the trainer’s resignation. Upon completion and certification of the election results the union shall be recognized as the exclusive collective bargaining agent for those workers whose employers are required to bargain, and the executive director of the board shall issue an order to affected employers to begin good faith negotiations for approval of employment agreements pursuant to the procedures set forth in this section.

(B) If an individual employer of backstretch workers declines to be represented in the multiemployer collective bargaining procedure described in clause (iii), the board shall issue an order to begin good faith negotiations for employment agreements on an individual employer basis. The board may provide mediation and conciliation services upon request of the parties at any time. If an employer is required under this subparagraph to collectively bargain with the union, and the parties do not reach an agreement within 90 days of the order, the board shall require the parties to participate in mandatory mediation and conciliation services for a period of 30 days. If no agreement results from this mediation, either or both parties may declare an impasse. Upon a party’s declaration of an impasse, the executive director of the board shall appoint an arbitrator in the manner described in paragraph (11) to determine the issues and issue a final and binding order establishing the terms of a collective bargaining agreement.

(9) No labor agreement under this article shall apply to any trainer or horseman with respect to employment associated with fair meetings prior to January 1, 2003. After this date, employees shall be added by accretion into an existing contract where applicable. For racing meetings conducted in the central and southern zones during the first three months of any calendar year and for fair racing meetings, this section shall not apply to trainers who normally reside and work outside of California and who are engaged in racing in this state for a limited period of time, not exceeding 90 racing days in any calendar year. For any other racing meeting conducted during any calendar year, this section shall not apply to trainers, backstretch workers, or both, who normally reside and work outside of California and who are engaged in racing in this state for a limited period of time, not exceeding 50 racing days in any calendar year.

(10) Except as provided in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (8), at any time subsequent to the expiration of an agreement under paragraph (8), when the agreement is not in effect, the board may recognize a majority interest, obtained during this period in the same manner as union recognition of employees, within a multiple employer bargaining unit who no longer desire to be represented by the union, and withdraw the recognition granted pursuant to this section from that union. An employer may inform his or her employees that a process for decertification exists and direct them to the board for information. However, any card, signature, vote, or other indicator obtained for this purpose by means of coercion or threat or with the assistance or inducement of any employer shall be invalid.

(11) Disputes, other than disputes concerning the operation and application of ongoing contracts, disputes subject to binding interest arbitration pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (8), and economic disputes arising in the context of multiemployer bargaining pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (8), but including disputes concerning the rights established in paragraphs (1) and (2), upon complaint shall be adjudicated by the stewards. The stewards shall have the authority to order any remedy, including reinstatement of employment, injunctive relief, damages, and attorney’s fees. An investigation and adjudication by the stewards shall be concluded as expeditiously as possible, consistent with applicable standards of due process. In addition, the board may require the parties to submit the issue to binding arbitration subject to judicial review in the same manner as decisions of the board. Disputes subject to this paragraph include disputes involving any backstretch employee or group of employees, and any trainer or group of trainers.

(12) Upon submission of a complaint to binding arbitration under any provision of this article, the executive director of the board shall select an arbitrator from a panel of professional arbitrators with expertise in labor negotiations selected by the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service or from a panel identified in collective bargaining agreements between labor organizations and employers in the horse racing industry in California, or both. The arbitrators selected by the service or identified in collective bargaining agreements shall be available to resolve the matter expeditiously. The arbitrator selected by the executive director shall have the authority to convene an immediate hearing and require the parties to exercise all due diligence in promptly attending to the issue in controversy. In all matters pertaining to the rights established by this article, an arbitrator shall have the authority to fashion an appropriate remedy, including reinstatement of employment, injunctive relief, damages, and attorney’s fees, and issuance of a make-whole remedy in the event of a persistent failure of a party to bargain in good faith. The board may take any administrative action within its authority to ensure compliance with decisions of arbitrators authorized by this section. Either party may also bring an action in state court to compel a party to go into arbitration or to enforce the decision of an arbitrator. Costs of arbitration shall be shared equally by the parties, and any party shall be entitled to recover any reasonable fees or costs incurred in securing compliance with or enforcement of an award or order of the arbitrator.

(e) Nothing in this section shall prevent a labor union and an individual trainer, or any group of trainers, from entering into a mutually acceptable agreement, which may substitute for the requirements of subdivision (d), for union organizing of employees of the horsemen or trainers. Nothing in this article shall be interpreted to require representative parties in negotiation to enter into any labor agreement, as long as each party is negotiating in a good faith effort to reach an agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19455.2.

(a) The board shall provide for labor agreements under this article to be binding upon every applicable licensee.

(b) No horseman or trainer who has a separate agreement with the exclusive representative labor union shall be required to be a party to a multiemployer collective bargaining agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 198, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19455.4.

The board may establish reasonable rules to regulate the time, place, and manner for representatives of labor unions to meet backstretch workers within the enclosure during working and nonworking hours. Those rules shall provide that the union and its representatives shall not interfere with the work of any employee, but shall have reasonable access to backstretch employees within the enclosure during working hours and nonworking hours, as determined by the board. With the approval of the board, these regulations may be superseded by collective bargaining agreements between horsemen’s organizations or trainers’ organizations and labor organizations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 198, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Licenses Generally [19460. - 19466.]

19460.

All licenses granted under this chapter:

(a) Shall be in writing.

(b) Are subject to all rules, regulations, and conditions prescribed by the board.

(c) Shall contain such conditions as are deemed necessary or desirable by the board for the best interests of horse racing and the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 272, Sec. 2.   (AB 2792)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19461.

Every license granted under this chapter is subject to suspension or revocation by the board in any case where the board has reason to believe that any condition regarding it has not been complied with, or that any law, including the Labor Code and the regulations adopted thereunder, or any rule or regulation of the board affecting it has been broken or violated.

All proceedings to revoke a license shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 198, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19461.1.

(a) The withdrawal of an application for a license after it has been filed with the board shall not, unless the board has consented in writing to the withdrawal, deprive the board of its authority to institute or continue a proceeding against the applicant for the denial of the license upon any ground provided by law, or to enter an order denying the license upon any of those grounds.

(b) The suspension, expiration, or forfeiture by operation of law of a license issued by the board, or its suspension, forfeiture, or cancellation by order of the board or by order of a court of law, or its surrender without the written consent of the board, shall not, during any period in which it may be renewed, restored, reissued, or reinstated, deprive the board of its authority to institute or continue a disciplinary proceeding against the licensee upon any ground provided by law, or to enter an order suspending or revoking the license or otherwise taking disciplinary action against the licensee on any of those grounds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 400, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

19461.5.

Upon a finding by the Labor Commissioner that a violation of any provision of the Labor Code, within the jurisdiction of the Labor Commissioner, has been committed by a person licensed pursuant to this chapter in the course of such licensed activity, the Labor Commissioner shall, upon expiration of the applicable period for appeal, notify the board of that finding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 198, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19462.

If any license is suspended or revoked, the board shall state publicly its reasons for the suspension or revocation, and shall cause an entry of such reasons to be made on its minute book.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19463.

The action of the board in suspending or revoking a license issued under this chapter is final, except that the propriety of the action of suspending or revoking a license or of any other final administrative action of the board is subject to review by any court of competent jurisdiction if the action is commenced in the court within 30 days of the board’s action. The action of the board shall stand unless and until reversed by a court. No action may be commenced in a court to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul any final action of the board unless it is commenced within 30 days of the board’s action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1740, Sec. 7.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

19464.

(a) No application for a horse owner’s license or for a license to conduct a race meeting shall be granted unless the applicant’s liability for workers’ compensation is secured in accordance with Division 4 (commencing with Section 3700) of the Labor Code. Any termination of security for that liability during the period of a license shall result in the immediate automatic suspension of the license during the period of that termination and also shall be a ground for revocation of the license.

(b) No application for a license to conduct a race meeting shall be granted unless the applicant has deposited with the board a surety bond in the amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), or a greater amount, as determined by the board, which is sufficient to ensure payment of employee wages and benefits including, but not limited to, health, welfare, and pension plans. The surety bond shall be maintained during the period of the meeting and for an additional period, as determined by the board, sufficient to assure that all payments are made. In the event of a dispute over the amount owed, the dispute shall be resolved through the grievance procedures set forth in the labor agreement of the union representing the class of employees affected.

For the purposes of this subdivision, an insured certificate of deposit payable to the Treasurer of the State of California shall be considered equivalent to a surety bond and shall be acceptable to the board upon such terms and conditions as it may prescribe. Interest paid to the state on the certificate of deposit shall be refunded to the applicant.

This subdivision does not apply to any person or association licensed to operate a horse race meeting prior to January 1, 2001, which has conducted a race meeting in each of the immediate three previous consecutive calendar years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19466.

The board shall maintain a current listing of its temporary and permanent licensees and shall include therein identifying information as to each licensee and the address of record. The board may provide a copy of the listing in the form requested by any federal, state, county, or municipal authority or racing jurisdiction. The board may require that its costs for providing a copy of a listing be reimbursed by the requesting authority or agency or organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1740, Sec. 8.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Licenses for Track Operators [19480. - 19497.]

19480.

(a) The board may issue to any person who makes application therefor in writing, who has complied with this chapter, and who makes the deposit to secure payment of the license fee imposed by this article, a license to conduct a horse racing meeting in accordance with this chapter at the track specified in the application if the board determines that the issuance thereof will be in the public interest and will subserve the purposes of this chapter.

(b) For purposes of this section, “person” means any officer, director, or partner, or any individual who holds 5 percent or more of outstanding shares, of a racing association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 997, Sec. 3.   (AB 179)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

19481.

In performing its responsibilities, the board shall do all of the following:

(a) Establish safety standards governing the uniformity and content of the track base and racing surface, inner and outer rails, gates and gaps, turf, access and egress to the track, lighting for night racing, equipment for horse and rider, drainage, communications, veterinary services, medical and ambulance services, and other track facilities in order to improve the safety of horses, riders, and workers at the
 racetrack.

(b) Designate a steward at all horse racing meetings to be responsible for enforcing compliance with safety standards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19481.3.

(a) Every racing association and racing fair licensed pursuant to this article shall maintain, staff, and supply an on-track first aid facility, that may be either permanent or mobile, and which shall be staffed and equipped as directed by the board. A qualified and licensed physician shall be on duty at all times during live racing, except that this provision shall not apply to: (1) a quarter horse racing association if there is a hospital situated no more than 1.5 miles from the racetrack and the racetrack has an agreement with the
 hospital to provide emergency medical services to jockeys and riders, or (2) a harness racing association if there is a hospital situated no more than 2.5 miles from the racetrack and the harness racing association has an agreement with the hospital to provide emergency medical services to injured drivers. An ambulance licensed to operate on public highways provided by the track shall be available at all times during live racing and shall be staffed by two emergency medical technicians licensed in accordance with Division 2.5 (commencing with Section 1797) of the Health and Safety Code, one of whom may be an Emergency Medical Technician Paramedic, as defined in Section 1797.84 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Each racing association and racing fair shall adopt and maintain an emergency medical plan detailing the procedures that shall be used in the event of an on-track injury. The plan shall be posted in each jockey room in English and
 Spanish.

(c) Prior to every race meeting, the racing association or racing fair shall contact area hospitals to coordinate procedures for the rapid admittance and treatment of emergency injuries.

(d) Each racing association or racing fair shall designate a health and safety manager and assistant manager, who shall be responsible for compliance with the provisions of this section and one of whom shall be on duty at all times when live racing is conducted. The health and safety manager may, at the discretion of the racing association, be the person designated to perform risk management duties on behalf of the association.

(e) The stewards shall investigate and prepare a report with respect to all on-track accidents involving jockeys that occur during the performance of their duties. The report shall, at a minimum,
 identify the circumstances of the accident, the likely causes, and the extent of any injuries. The investigation shall be commenced no later than the next live racing day and shall be completed expeditiously. Upon completion of the report, it shall immediately be sent by facsimile or electronic mail to the entity certified to provide health and welfare for jockeys pursuant to Section 19612.9, to the jockey or his or her representative, the racing association, and the owner and trainer of the horse the jockey was riding at the time of the accident.

(f) The board shall adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this section no later than July 1, 2007.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 19, Sec. 1.   Effective June 2, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19481.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no license shall be issued to conduct a horse racing meeting upon a track unless the track has been inspected by the board within 30 days prior to the date of application for a license and the track has been approved by the board as conforming to the racetrack safety standards set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 19481.

(b) The board shall adopt regulations to establish standards governing the employee housing provided to backstretch personnel at licensed racetracks. These regulations shall be commensurate with the housing standards established in the Employee Housing Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 17000) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code), and shall consider the following:

(1) The health and safety of the human and equine population and the necessity for humans and horses to live in close proximity.

(2) The housing needs of state or county facilities with live racing meetings of no more than 43 days in duration that do not operate as year-round training facilities. The board shall specifically consider the different needs of these facilities compared to permanent facilities or other state and county facilities that
 function on a year-round basis, including state and county fair facilities that operate as year-round training facilities where horses are stabled and workers live.

(3) Compliance of facilities with racing meetings of 19 days or less, even if they operate as a year-round training facility, with this subdivision shall be contingent on funding in the Budget Act of 2002 (Chapter 379 of the Statutes of 2002).

(c) Commencing January 1, 2004, the board, with assistance from the California Department of Housing and Community Development or a local building department or other local entity designated by the jurisdiction in which the racetrack is located, shall annually inspect the living conditions of backstretch employee housing to ensure compliance with the housing standards established by the board, the findings or results of which shall be submitted to the board. No license shall be
 issued to a racing association to conduct a horse race meeting unless the board has inspected the housing conditions that exist on the racetrack’s backstretch and determined the living conditions to be in compliance with the standards established by the board in subdivision (b).

(d) The board may assess a reasonable fee upon racing associations to defray the costs associated with the inspections provided for in subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 21.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

19481.7.

(a) (1) The board may, at any time, immediately suspend a license to conduct a racing meeting when necessary to protect the health and safety of the horses or riders that are present at the racing meeting.

(2) The suspension shall require a vote of at least four members of the board.
